Idaho statutes. Title 2 JURIES AND JURORS
Chapter 1
JURIES — KINDS AND DEFINITIONS

Section.

§ 2-101. Jury defined.

A jury is a body of men or women, or both, temporarily selected from the citizens of a particular county and invested with power to present or indict a person for a public offense or to try a question of fact.

§ 2-102. Kinds of juries.

Juries are of three (3) kinds:

Grand juries.

Trial juries.

Juries of inquest.

§ 2-103. Grand jury defined.

A grand jury is a body of men or women or both, sixteen (16) in number, returned in pursuance of law from citizens of the county before a court of competent jurisdiction and sworn to inquire of public offenses committed or triable within the county.

§ 2-104. Trial jury defined — Verdict in civil actions.

A trial jury is a body of men or women, or both, returned from the citizens of a particular county before a court or officer of competent jurisdiction and sworn to try and determine by a verdict a question of fact. Three-fourths (3/4) of the jury may render a verdict in a civil action, and such verdict shall have the same effect as a unanimous verdict.

§ 2-105. Constitution of trial jury.

A trial jury consists of twelve (12) men or women or both: provided, that in civil actions the jury may consist of any number less than twelve (12) upon which the parties may agree in open court: and provided, further, that in cases of misdemeanor and in civil actions involving not more than five hundred dollars ($500), exclusive of costs, the jury shall consist of not more than six (6).

§ 2-106. Jury of inquest defined.

A jury of inquest is a body of men or women, or both, summoned from the citizens of a particular county, before the sheriff, coroner, or other ministerial officer to inquire of particular facts.